Washington statutes.
RCW 38.04.040

Composition of organized militia.

The organized militia of Washington shall consist of the commissioned officers, warrant officers, enlisted persons, organizations, staffs, corps, and departments of the regularly commissioned, warranted and enlisted militia of the state, organized and maintained pursuant to law. Its numerical strength, composition, distribution, organization, arms, uniforms, equipment, training and discipline shall be prescribed by the governor in conformity with, and subject to the limitations imposed by the laws and regulations of the United States and the laws of this state: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the minimum enlisted strength of the organized militia of this state shall never be less than two thousand. The organized militia may include persons residing outside the state of Washington.

[ 1989 c 19 s 4; 1943 c 130 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-4. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 3. Cf. 1909 c 108 s 10, part; 1895 c 108 s 10, part.]